Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 10 State Fair

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for injury inflicted by domestic animal at show, 80 ALR2d 886.

Exemption from taxation of property of argicultural fair society or association, 89 ALR2d 1104.

Validity, construction, and effect of agreement exempting operator of amusement facility from liability for personal injury or death of patron, 54 ALR5th 513.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture §§ 133 to 136.

§ 11-10-101.
Annual state fair; where held; purpose.

The state fair board, with the assistance of the department of agriculture, shall hold an annual state fair at Douglas, Wyoming dedicated to honoring Wyoming’s agricultural heritage and culture by cultivating Wyoming’s agricultural future through competitions, educational displays and experiential exhibits for youth producers and the general public.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 48, § 6; C.S. 1910, § 716; Laws 1919, ch. 103, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 824; R.S. 1931, § 105-101; C.S. 1945, § 34-302; W.S. 1957, § 11-126; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1989, ch. 9, § 1; 2011, ch. 72, § 1; 2018 ch. 111, § 1, effective September 1, 2018.

Cross references. —

As to student participation as an exhibitor in the annual state fair being defined as an excused absence, see § 21-3-111(a)(xvi).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, deleted “if requested” following “furnishes to the department.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective September 1, 2018, rewrote the section, which read: “The department of agriculture shall hold an annual state fair at Douglas, Wyoming, where all important products of the state shall be recognized according to merit by premiums or rewards for excellence offered out of an appropriation provided by the legislature. No person shall collect any award until he furnishes to the department a complete history in writing of how the exhibit was produced and all other information concerning the entry that would be of interest or benefit to the general public.”

§ 11-10-102.
Duties and responsibilities with respect to the annual state fair and fairgrounds.

The general charge and supervision of the state fair is under the state fair board with the assistance of the department of agriculture.

The department shall prepare budget requests on behalf of and subject to the approval of the state fair board for the conduct and management of the annual state fair and for the operation and maintenance of the state fairgrounds, including building and facility needs for major maintenance and repair. The director is responsible for the proper disbursement of all funds appropriated for the annual state fair and fairgrounds.

The state fair board shall:

Select from among its voting members a chairman and a vice-chairman;

Hold at least four (4) regular meetings per year at such times and places as the chairman shall specify. Special meetings may be called by the chairman or upon request of a majority of the voting members. A majority of the voting members of the state fair board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business;

Be administratively supported by the department;

Provide for the year round operation and maintenance of the state fairgrounds in a manner that:

Maximizes revenues but does not disrupt the annual state fair;

Ensures the facilities are maintained in good working order.

Monitor any state fairgrounds facility needs assessment conducted by the state construction department and, subject to available funding, implement recommendations received under subsection (d) of this section to prioritize and remediate the identified needs;

To the extent the employment of a state fair manager would aid in accomplishing the duties required by this chapter, appoint a state fair manager to conduct and supervise the annual state fair and to manage the year round operation and maintenance of the state fairgrounds. Any appointment shall be made with the approval of the governor and shall be subject to removal authority provided by W.S.

9-1-202

. The state fair board may hire and provide for the supervision of other employees necessary to accomplish the duties required by this chapter and may contract for services to advertise and promote the annual state fair and the fairgrounds;

To the extent establishing a subcommittee would aid in executing the annual state fair, appoint a subcommittee of state fair board members to plan, conduct or supervise the annual state fair. The director shall serve as chairman of any subcommittee appointed under this paragraph.

The state construction department shall, in addition to the comprehensive needs assessment conducted pursuant to W.S.

9-5-107

, and upon request of the state fair board:

Assess the state fairground buildings and facility needs; and

Submit recommendations to the state fair board to prioritize and remediate the identified needs.

The Wyoming tourism board shall promote the annual state fair throughout the state of Wyoming and adjoining states.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 103, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 825; R.S. 1931, § 105-102; Laws 1941, ch. 18, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 34-301; W.S. 1957, § 11-128; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1989, ch. 9, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2011, ch. 72, § 1; 2018 ch. 111, § 1, effective September 1, 2018.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added “and fairgrounds” at the end of the second sentence, and inserted “operation and” in the last sentence.

The 2018 amendment,

effective September 1, 2018, redesignated the existing language as (a) and (b); in present (a), substituted “state fair board with the assistance of” for “director of” preceding “the department” and deleted the former second sentence, which read: “The director may employ a competent manager and other employees necessary for the proper conduct and management of the fair and fairgrounds”; in present (b), added the first sentence and, at the end of the second sentence, substituted “the annual state fair and fairgrounds” for “the operation and maintenance of the fair”; and added (c) through (e).

§ 11-10-103.
Reversion
of fairgrounds to donor.

If the state fails for
three (3) consecutive years to hold a state fair, the lands used for
the purpose of a state fair shall revert to the person donating them,
the state having the right to remove all buildings, fences and improvements
of whatever nature within twenty-four (24) months after the date on
which the fair should have been held. All buildings, fences and improvements
remaining on the land after the expiration of the twenty-four (24)
months shall become the property of the owner of the land.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 48, § 7; C.S. 1910, § 717; C.S. 1920, § 826; R.S. 1931, § 105-103; C.S. 1945, § 34-303; W.S. 1957, § 11-129; W.S. 1977, §

11-10-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2011, ch. 72, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “twenty-four (24)” for “three (3)” twice.

§ 11-10-104.
Catalogues.

At least three (3) months before any annual fair, the state fair board shall have a catalogue prepared and copies available for distribution to any person requesting it.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 48, § 8; C.S. 1910, § 718; Laws 1919, ch. 103, § 5; C.S. 1920, § 827; R.S. 1931, § 105-104; C.S. 1945, § 34-304; W.S. 1957, § 11-130; W.S. 1977, §

11-10-105

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1989, ch. 9, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2011, ch. 72, § 1; 2018 ch. 111, § 1, effective September 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 111, § 1, effective September 1, 2018.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “available” for “sent to the county clerks of the state.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective September 1, 2018, substituted “state fair board” for “director of the department of agriculture.”

§ 11-10-105.
Entry fees.

A fee may be charged for any in-state or out-of-state exhibit to be entered in the state fair at an amount set by the state fair board.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 48, § 9; C.S. 1910, § 719; Laws 1919, ch. 103, § 6; C.S. 1920, § 828; R.S. 1931, § 105-105; C.S. 1945, § 34-305; W.S. 1957, § 11-131; W.S. 1977, §

11-10-106

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1983, ch. 2, § 1; 1989, ch. 9, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2001, ch. 131, § 1; 2018 ch. 111, § 1, effective September 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 111, § 1, effective September 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective September 1, 2018, substituted “the state fair board” for “the director of the department of agriculture and the board” following “set by.”

Cross references. —

As to supervision generally of state fair by state board of agriculture, see §

11-10-102

.

§ 11-10-106.
Admission charges; other revenues.

There shall be charged at the gates of the fairground an admission fee to be set by the state fair board. An extra charge may be made for seats in the grandstand or other structure providing added comforts. The charge for vehicles driven or stock ridden into the grounds may be fixed by the state fair board. All fees collected shall be deposited in the Wyoming state fair account, except fees directed by law to the state fair endowment account.

The department of agriculture may receive any money or property of any kind or character donated, granted or bequeathed for any activities of the state fair. Monies shall be credited to the Wyoming state fair account except as otherwise provided by W.S.

11-10-107

and

11-10-108

. The department, on behalf of the state fair board, shall include within its biennial budget request submitted under W.S.

9-2-1013

a report itemizing all gifts, income and expenditures under this subsection, W.S.

11-10-107

and

11-10-108

for each of the immediately preceding two (2) fiscal years.

History:

Laws 1905, ch. 48, § 10; C.S. 1910, § 720; Laws 1919, ch. 103, § 7; C.S. 1920, § 829; R.S. 1931, § 105-106; C.S. 1945, § 34-306; W.S. 1957, § 11-132; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

11-10-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1983, ch. 2, § 1; 1993, ch. 208, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2014 ch. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2018 ch. 111, § 1, effective September 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 122, § 2, effective March 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 111, § 1, effective September 1, 2018.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the trust and agency fund” at the end of (a) and at the end of the second sentence in (b).

The 2014 amendment,

rewrote the third sentence.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 111, § 1, effective September 1, 2018, in (a), twice inserted “state fair” preceding “board,” and, in (b), in the third sentence, inserted “on behalf of the state fair board” following “The department.”

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 122, § 2, added “except fees directed by law to the state fair endowment account” at the end of (a); and, in (b), in the second sentence, inserted “Wyoming” preceding “state fair” and added “except as otherwise provided by W.S.

11-10-107

and

11-10-118

,” and in the second sentence, added “W.S.

11-10-107

and

11-10-118

.”

Laws 2018, ch. 122, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.

§ 11-10-107.
Power of state fair board to acquire land; authority to make rules and regulations; renting and use of fairgrounds.

Consistent with W.S. 9-5-106(a) and (c), the state fair board may acquire by donation or lease in the name of the state any lands necessary for conducting the annual state fair, and may make all rules and regulations necessary for the conduct and government of the exhibitions, the sale of privileges, and the proper control, operation and conduct of the annual state fair and the state fairgrounds not inconsistent with the constitution and laws of this state. The state fair board may rent out or donate the use of the state fairgrounds for stabling and training stock and holding stock sales. The grounds may be used free of charge for encampment grounds for the state militia under the direction of the adjutant general of the state. The board shall permit the grounds and facilities to be used for other purposes and shall charge fees as it deems necessary to maximize revenues and pay the expenses of maintaining the grounds and facilities.

The state fair board may rent out or donate the use of the state fairgrounds for stabling and training stock and holding stock sales. The grounds may be used free of charge for encampment grounds for the state militia under the direction of the adjutant general of the state. The board shall permit the grounds and facilities to be used for other purposes and shall charge fees as it deems necessary to maximize revenues and pay the expenses of maintaining the grounds and facilities. One percent (1%) of any revenue generated under this subsection shall be distributed to the state fair endowment account and the remainder of any revenue generated under this subsection shall be distributed to the Wyoming state fair account.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 48, § 12; C.S. 1910, § 722; Laws 1919, ch. 103, § 8; C.S. 1920, § 830; R.S. 1931, § 105-107; C.S. 1945, § 34-307; W.S. 1957, § 11-133; W.S. 1977, §

11-10-108

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1983, ch. 2, § 1; 1989, ch. 244, § 2; 2011, ch. 72, § 1; 2018 ch. 111, § 1, effective September 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 122, § 2, effective March 14, 2018.

Cross references. —

As to supervision generally of state fair by state board of agriculture, see §

11-10-102

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, deleted “in its discretion” following “The board” in the fourth sentence.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 111, § 1, effective September 1, 2018, in the first sentence, substituted “Consistent with W.S. 9-5-106(a) and (c), the state fair” for “The,” twice inserted “annual” preceding “state fair,” and inserted “and the state fairgrounds” preceding “not inconsistent,” in the second sentence, inserted “state fair” preceding “board,” in the fourth sentence, twice substituted “shall” for “may” and inserted “maximize venues and” preceding “pay,” and deleted the former fourth sentence, which read: “The board shall not permit any gambling device of any nature to be operated on the grounds, or permit any unlawful betting, or permit any intoxicating liquors to be sold thereon except as provided by W.S.

12-4-505

.”

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 122, § 2, redesignated the existing language as (a) and (b); and, in (b), substituted the present last sentence for “The board shall not permit any gambling device of any nature to be operated on the grounds, or permit any unlawful betting, or permit any intoxicating liquors to be sold thereon except as provided by W.S.

12-4-505

.”

Laws 2018, ch. 122, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

§ 11-10-108.
Rodeos; generally.

The state fair board may provide a rodeo as part of the state fair program, provided there is no restriction on any Wyoming resident who desires to participate in the rodeo other than the prescribed entry fee, unless the restriction is required by a sanctioning body as part of the terms and conditions to sanction the rodeo. Any contract entered into with any person to provide entertainment under this section is void if it in any manner excludes a Wyoming resident from participation in the entertainment because of membership or nonmembership in any organization or group.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 259, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-141; Laws 1959, ch. 5, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, §

11-10-115

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1989, ch. 9, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2006, ch. 4, § 1; 2018 ch. 111, § 1, effective September 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 111, § 1, effective September 1, 2018.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, inserted “unless the restriction is required by a sanctioning body as part of the terms and conditions to sanction the rodeo.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective September 1, 2018, in the first sentence substituted “state fair” for “director of the department of agriculture and the” preceding “board”.

§ 11-10-109.
Rodeos; liability for injuries.

The state of Wyoming
is not responsible or liable in any manner for any injury sustained
by anyone participating in the rodeo at the Wyoming state fair.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 259, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-142; Laws 1959, ch. 5, §§ 1, 3; W.S. 1977, §

11-10-116

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-10-110.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011,
ch. 72, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to county fair generally, see §§

18-9-101

to

18-9-103

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1955, ch. 200, § 1, related to allocation of funds to county agricultural fair associations for prizes.

Laws 2011, ch. 72, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 11-10-111.
Reports.

The director of the department
of agriculture shall make reports as required by W.S.

9-2-1014

in regard to the state fair.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 48, § 13; C.S. 1910, § 723; Laws 1919, ch. 103, § 9; C.S. 1920, § 831; R.S. 1931, § 105-108; C.S. 1945, § 34-308; W.S. 1957, § 11-144; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

11-11-117

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1989, ch. 9, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “9-2-1014” for “9-2-103.”

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3 provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 11-10-112.
Wyoming Pioneer Memorial Museum.

A building to be known
as the “Wyoming Pioneer Memorial Museum” is authorized to house pioneer
relics on the state fairgrounds, and for such other purposes as deemed
necessary by the board.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 213, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-145; W.S. 1977, §

11-11-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-10-113.
Wyoming Pioneer Memorial Museum; supervision thereof.

The supervision, maintenance
and operation of the museum is under the director of the department
of state parks and cultural resources. The director may assign or
employ necessary personnel to maintain the exhibits and receive visitors,
and may enter into agreements for the loan of exhibits, providing
the state of Wyoming is not liable therefor.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 213, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 11-147; W.S. 1977, §

11-11-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1989, ch. 9, § 1; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 1999, ch. 69, § 2.

§ 11-10-114.
Wyoming Pioneer Memorial Museum; admission fee.

A nominal admission fee
may be charged to reimburse the general fund for maintenance costs.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 213, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 11-148; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

11-11-103

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-10-115.
State fair board; membership; terms; compensation.

There is created the state fair board consisting of the following members:

One (1) voting member appointed by the governor from each of the four (4) quadrants specified in W.S. 11-2-102(e)(i) through (iv). Each of these members shall be engaged primarily in agricultural work and shall be selected to represent a cross section of the agriculture industry. Appointments shall rotate consecutively among all the counties of the quadrants;

One (1) voting member jointly appointed by a majority vote of both the Converse county board of commissioners and the governing body of the city of Douglas;

One (1) voting member appointed by the dean of the University of Wyoming college of agriculture from the Wyoming cooperative extension service;

One (1) voting member selected by the Wyoming vocational agricultural teachers association from its membership;

One (1) voting member appointed by the governor from the department of state parks and cultural resources;

One (1) voting member appointed by the governor from the Wyoming business council;

One (1) voting member appointed by the governor from the Wyoming tourism board or a representative of the Wyoming tourism board;

One (1) voting member appointed by the governor from the energy industry;

One (1) at-large voting member who is engaged primarily in agricultural work, appointed by the governor;

The director shall serve as a voting member;

The governor or his designee and the dean of the University of Wyoming college of agriculture, or the dean’s designee, shall serve as nonvoting ex officio members.

The members of the state fair board appointed under paragraph (a)(i) of this section shall serve for a term of six (6) years. The members of the state fair board appointed under paragraphs (a)(ii) through (ix) of this section shall serve for a term of four (4) years. Any state fair board member appointed by the governor is subject to removal as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

Except as provided in this section, the state fair board members shall be paid a salary of one hundred dollars ($100.00) per day for attending and traveling to and from official state fair board meetings and shall receive mileage and per diem in the same manner as state employees as provided by W.S.

9-3-102

. Members who are government employees or public officials appointed to the state fair board to represent an agency, department, board or institution of the state, including the University of Wyoming, shall receive no salary but shall be considered on official business when performing duties as members of the state fair board and shall receive mileage and per diem in the manner provided by the agency, department, board or institution the member represents.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 191, § 2; 1998, ch. 40, § 1; 2007, ch. 204, § 1; 2011, ch. 72, § 1; 2018 ch. 111, § 1, effective September 1, 2018.

Editor’s notes.—

Laws 2018, ch. 111, § 2, provides: “The governor and other entities responsible for appointing members to the state fair board shall solicit applications and consider applicants for appointments to the state fair board. Appointments of members to the state fair board shall be made before September 1, 2018. Members appointed to the state fair board pursuant to this act shall begin their terms on September 1, 2018.”

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) deleted “appointed” preceding “members of the board of agriculture” and inserted “appointed pursuant to W.S. 11-2-102(b).”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, inserted all references to state fair advisory board throughout the section.

The 2018 amendment,

effective September 1, 2018, redesignated the existing language of (a) as the present introductory language of (a) and (a)(i) through (a)(iv); in the present introductory language of (a), substituted “state fair board consisting of the following members” for “state fair advisory board which shall serve as advisor to the board of agriculture on the operation of the state fair and the operation and maintenance of the state fairgrounds. The state fair advisory board shall consist of ten (10)”; in present (a)(i), in the first sentence, substituted “One (1) voting member appointed by the governor from each of the four (4) quadrants specified in W.S. 11-2-102(e)(i) through (iv)” for “One (1) member appointed by each of the seven (7) members of the board of agriculture appointed pursuant to W.S. 11-2-102(b),” and added the last two sentences; in present (a)(ii), rewrote the former existing language, which read: “One (1) member appointed by the Converse county board of commissioners,” in present (a)(iii) and (a)(iv), substituted “One (1) voting” for “One (1)” preceding “member”; in present (a)(iv), deleted the former second sentence, which read: “The state fair advisory board members shall receive no salary in the performance of their duties but shall receive mileage and per diem the same as state employees as provided by W.S.

9-3-102

”; added (a)(v) through (a)(xi).; rewrote (b), which read: “The state fair advisory board member appointed by the Converse county board of commissioners, the state fair advisory board member appointed by the dean of the University of Wyoming college of agriculture and the state fair advisory board member selected by the Wyoming vocational agriculture teachers association shall serve a four (4) year term. All other state fair advisory board members shall serve at the pleasure of the person who appointed the state fair advisory board member and in no event shall the term of any state fair advisory member exceed the corresponding term of the appointing board of agriculture member”; and added (c).

§ 11-10-116.
[Repealed].

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 70, § 1, pursuant to W. S.

11-10-117

.

§ 11-10-117.
Sunset.

W.S.

11-10-116

is repealed June 30, 2013.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 70, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 70, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2011.

§ 11-10-118.
State fair endowment account; administration; distributions; purposes.

The state fair endowment account is created. The state treasurer is authorized to accept cash gifts for the account. Funds within the account including all funds deposited to the account from any source are intended to be inviolate and constitute a permanent or perpetual trust fund. The state treasurer shall invest funds within the endowment account in accordance with law. Seventy-five percent (75%) of investment earnings shall be credited to the endowment account. Twenty-five percent (25%) of investment earnings shall be distributed to the Wyoming state fair account.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 144, § 3.

History.

2018 ch. 122, § 1, effective March 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 144, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "to the Wyoming state fair account" for "accordance with subsection (b) of this section" in the last sentence of (a).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 144, § 3, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (b), which read, "The state treasurer shall distribute twenty-five (25%) percent of investment earnings from the state fair endowment account to the Wyoming state fair account quarterly."

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 122, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.